Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1354
Notice of registration.

(a) A person that registers a Canadian judgment under section 25-1352 shall cause notice of registration to be served on the person against whom the judgment has been registered.

(b) Notice under this section must be served in the same manner that a summons and complaint must be served in an action seeking recognition under section 25-1342 of a foreign-country money judgment.

(c) Notice under this section must include:

(1) the date of registration and court in which the judgment was registered;

(2) the docket number assigned to the registration;

(3) the name and address of:

(A) the person registering the judgment; and

(B) the person's attorney, if any;

(4) a copy of the registration, including the documents required under subsection (b) of section 25-1352; and

(5) a statement that:

(A) the person against whom the judgment has been registered, not later than thirty days after the date of service of notice, may motion the court to vacate the registration; and

(B) the court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time.

(d) Proof of service of notice under this section must be filed with the clerk of the court.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 18.